.deps/tt.LR.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 

%<n%>              ! Имя существительное 
%<prn%>            ! Местоимение
%<adv%>            ! Наречие
%<num%>            ! Число
%<det%>            ! 
%<np%>             ! Имя обственное
%<v%>              ! Глагол
%<vaux%>           ! 
%<adj%>            ! Прилагательное
%<post%>           ! Послелог
%<postadv%>        ! Посленаречие
%<pred%>           ! 
%<qst%>            ! 
%<cnjcoo%>         ! Союз
%<cnjadv%>         ! Союз

%<part%>           ! Частица
%<pers%>           ! 
%<itg%>            ! 
%<dem%>            ! 
%<qnt%>            ! 
%<ord%>            ! 
%<ref%>            ! 

%<caus%>           ! 
%<pass%>           ! 
%<neg%>            ! 
%<pron%>           ! 
%<attr%>           ! 
%<locattr%>        ! 
%<coop%>           ! 

%<top%>            ! 
%<ant%>            ! 

%<sim%>            ! 
%<comp%>           ! 

%<tv%>             !
%<iv%>             !

%<m%>              !
%<f%>              !

%<p1%>             !
%<p2%>             !
%<p3%>             !

%<px1sg%>          !
%<px2sg%>          !
%<px3sp%>          !
%<px1pl%>          !
%<px2pl%>          !

%<sg%>             ! Единственное число
%<pl%>             ! Множественное число

%<nom%>            ! Именительный
%<gen%>            ! Родительный
%<dat%>            ! Дательный
%<acc%>            ! Винительый
%<loc%>            ! 
%<abl%>            ! 

%<pres%>           ! -{A}
%<past%>           ! -{G}{A}н 
%<fut%>            ! -{I}р
%<ifi%>            ! -{D}{I} 
%<imp%>            ! 

%<ger1%>           ! -м{A}{K}
%<ger2%>           ! -{I}п
%<ger3%>           ! -{G}{A}ч
%<ger4%>           ! -{G}{A}нч{I}
%<ger5%>           ! -{G}{A}н
%<ger6%>           ! -{I}р / -{A}р
%<ger7%>           ! -{A}ч{A}к
%<cond%>           ! -с{A}

%<sent%>           ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>           ! Hyphen
%<cm%>             ! Comma
%<apos%>           ! Apostrophe
%<rquot%>          ! Quote marker (right hand side) 
%<lquot%>          ! Quote marker (left hand side) 
%<rpar%>           ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side) 
%<lpar%>           ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side) 


%{L%}              ! 
%{G%}              ! 
%{D%}              ! 
%{K%}              ! 
%{I%}              ! 
%{A%}              ! 
%{E%}              ! 

%{s%}              ! 
%{n%}              ! 
%{j%}              ! 
%{w%}              ! 
%{l%}              ! 

%>                 !

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

Conjunctions ; 
Postpositions ; 
Postadverbs ;
Pronouns ; 
Determiners ; 
Numerals ; 
Nouns ; 
ProperNouns ;
Adjectives ; 
Adverbs ; 
Verbs ; 
Punctuation ; 

LEXICON CLIT

%+да%<cnjcoo%>:% %{D%}%{A%} # ;
%+мы%<qst%>:%>м%{I%} # ;
%+дыр%<part%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р # ;
%+сы%<part%>:%>с%{I%} # ; ! FIXME: check
# ;

LEXICON CASE 

%<nom%>: CLIT ;
%<gen%>:%>н%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} CLIT ;
%<acc%>:%>н%{I%} CLIT ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLIT ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLIT ;

LEXICON POSS-REAL

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м CASE ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң CASE ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASE ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}з CASE ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}%{G%}%{I%}з CASE ;

CASE ;

LEXICON POSS

%<pron%>:%>%{L%}%{I%}%{K%}%{I%} CASE ;

POSS-REAL ;

LEXICON NLEX-SG

%<n%>: POSS ; 
%<n%>%<locattr%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}%{G%}%{I%} POSS ;

LEXICON NLEX-PL

%<n%>%<pl%>: POSS ; 

LEXICON NLEX

%<n%>: POSS ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSS ; 
%<n%>%<locattr%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}%{G%}%{I%} POSS ;

LEXICON DIGITLEX

%<num%>: # ; 


LEXICON NUMLEX

%<num%>: POSS ; 
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} POSS ; 
%<num%>%<sim%>:%>%{A%}р POSS ; 


LEXICON NPANTMLEX

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON NPANTFLEX

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: CASE ; 



LEXICON NPTOPLEX

%<np%>%<top%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON ALEX

%<adj%>: # ; 
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} # ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-S1 

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>г%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S2

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ң CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>ҡ CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>г%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S3-NO1SG

%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}г%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S3

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н CLIT ;

V-PERS-S3-NO1SG ; 

LEXICON V-FUT-IR

%<fut%>:%>%{I%}р V-PERS-S3 ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>м%{A%}с V-PERS-S3-NO1SG ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}%>м CLIT ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}с%>м%{I%}н CLIT ; ! Dir/LR 
%<ger6%>:%>%{I%}р POSS ;
%<neg%>%<ger6%>:%>м%{A%}%>%{I%}р POSS ;

LEXICON V-FUT-AR

%<fut%>:%>%{A%}р V-PERS-S3 ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>м%{A%}с V-PERS-S3 ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}%>м CLIT ; 
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}с%>м%{I%}н CLIT ; ! Dir/LR 
%<ger6%>:%>%{A%}р POSS ;
%<neg%>%<ger6%>:%>м%{A%}%>%{A%}р POSS ;

LEXICON V-FINITE-FORMS

%<pres%>:%>%{E%} V-PERS-S1 ; 
%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ; 
%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-PERS-S3 ; 

LEXICON V-COMMON-LEX

V-FINITE-FORMS ; 

%<ger1%>:%>м%{A%}%{K%} POSS ; 
%<ger2%>:%>%{I%}п POSS ; 
%<ger3%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}ч POSS ; 
%<ger4%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}нч%{I%} POSS ; 
%<ger5%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н POSS ;
%<ger7%>:%>%{A%}ч%{A%}к POSS ;
%<cond%>:%>с%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ;

%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: CLIT ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%{I%}г%{I%}з CLIT ;

LEXICON V-NEG

%<neg%>:%>м%{A%} V-COMMON-LEX ; 

V-COMMON-LEX ; 

LEXICON V-DER

%<caus%>:%>%{I%}т V-NEG ;
%<coop%>:%>%{I%}ш V-NEG ;

V-NEG ;

LEXICON V-IV-IR-LEX

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-FUT-IR; 
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-DER; 

LEXICON V-TV-IR-LEX

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-FUT-IR; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-FUT-IR ; 

LEXICON V-IV-AR-LEX

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-FUT-AR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-DER; 

LEXICON V-TV-AR-LEX

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-FUT-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-COMMON-LEX ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-FUT-AR ; 

LEXICON VAUX

%<vaux%>: V-PERS-S2 ;

LEXICON Nouns 
ел:ел NLEX-SG ; ! "" 
ел:ел%>лар NLEX-PL ; 
заман:заман NLEX ; ! "" 
бар:бар NLEX ; ! "" 
гомер:гомер NLEX ; ! "" 
йорт:йорт NLEX ; ! "" 
тараф:тараф NLEX ; ! "" 
азак:азак NLEX ; ! "" 
тавыш:тавыш NLEX ; ! "" 
көч:көч NLEX ; ! "" 
вакыйга:вакыйга NLEX ; ! "" 
тынычлык:тынычлык NLEX ; ! "" 
күренеш:күренеш NLEX ; ! "" 
рәт:рәт NLEX ; ! "" 
минут:минут NLEX ; ! "" 
хакыйкать:хакыйкать NLEX ; ! "" 
әгъза:әгъза NLEX ; ! "" 
тәрәзә:тәрәзә NLEX ; ! "" 
урам:урам NLEX ; ! "" 
җан:җан NLEX ; ! "" 
иңбаш:иңбаш NLEX ; ! "" 
халык:халык NLEX ; ! "" 
вакыйга:вакыйга NLEX ; ! "" 
фикер:фикер NLEX ; ! "" 
ул:ул NLEX ; ! "" 
дивар:дивар NLEX ; ! "" 
тән:тән NLEX ; ! "" 
әнкәй:әнкәй NLEX ; ! "" 
әҗәл:әҗәл NLEX ; ! "" 
сурәт:сурәт NLEX ; ! "" 
мөнәсәбәт:мөнәсәбәт NLEX ; ! "" 
түрә:түрә NLEX ; ! "" 
күк:күк NLEX ; ! "" 
һава:һава NLEX ; ! "" 
ир% туган:ир% туган NLEX ; ! "" 
фатир:фатир NLEX ; ! "" 
хуҗа:хуҗа NLEX ; ! "" 
хезмәт:хезмәт NLEX ; ! "" 
кояш:кояш NLEX ; ! "" 
колак:колак NLEX ; ! "" 
яр% буе:яр% буе NLEX ; ! "" 
ир-ат:ир-ат NLEX ; ! "" 
мизгел:мизгел NLEX ; ! "" 
хис:хис NLEX ; ! "" 
гаскәр:гаскәр NLEX ; ! "" 
ир:ир NLEX ; ! "" 
ялкын:ялкын NLEX ; ! "" 
кара:кара NLEX ; ! "" 
чатлык:чатлык NLEX ; ! "" 
күкрәк:күкрәк NLEX ; ! "" 
нимес:нимес NLEX ; ! "" 
абый:абый NLEX ; ! "" 
чират:чират NLEX ; ! "" 
эт:эт NLEX ; ! "" 
халәт:халәт NLEX ; ! "" 
кыз% бала:кыз% бала NLEX ; ! "" 
мәсьәлә:мәсьәлә NLEX ; ! "" 
элемтә:элемтә NLEX ; ! "" 
үлчәү:үлчәү NLEX ; ! "" 
йөзьел:йөзьел NLEX ; ! "" 
әмәл:әмәл NLEX ; ! "" 
тәэсир:тәэсир NLEX ; ! "" 
агыш:агыш NLEX ; ! "" 
фирка:фирка NLEX ; ! "" 
елга:елга NLEX ; ! "" 
тел:тел NLEX ; ! "" 
сәбәп:сәбәп NLEX ; ! "" 
куркыныч:куркыныч NLEX ; ! "" 
табиб:табиб NLEX ; ! "" 
әрнү:әрнү NLEX ; ! "" 
нәтиҗә:нәтиҗә NLEX ; ! "" 
теләк:теләк NLEX ; ! "" 
язучы:язучы NLEX ; ! "" 
документ:документ NLEX ; ! "" 
эз:эз NLEX ; ! "" 
сыйныф:сыйныф NLEX ; ! "" 
очрашу:очрашу NLEX ; ! "" 
хезмәт:хезмәт NLEX ; ! "" 
илбашы:илбашы NLEX ; ! "" 
ядкарь:ядкарь NLEX ; ! "" 
дәрт:дәрт NLEX ; ! "" 
бәхет:бәхет NLEX ; ! "" 
очкыч:очкыч NLEX ; ! "" 
картина:картина NLEX ; ! "" 
бүлмә:бүлмә NLEX ; ! "" 
телефон:телефон NLEX ; ! "" 
доктор:доктор NLEX ; ! "" 
кызыксыну:кызыксыну NLEX ; ! "" 
лейтенант:лейтенант NLEX ; ! "" 
сыйфат:сыйфат NLEX ; ! "" 
банк:банк NLEX ; ! "" 
тотка:тотка NLEX ; ! "" 
хөкүмәт:хөкүмәт NLEX ; ! "" 
дәрәҗә:дәрәҗә NLEX ; ! ""
профессор:профессор NLEX ; ! ""
союз:союз NLEX ; ! ""
ярты:ярты NLEX ; ! ""
инану:инану NLEX ; ! ""
өлкә:өлкә NLEX ; ! ""
ашамлыклар:ашамлыклар NLEX ; ! ""
зат:зат NLEX ; ! ""
мәгълүмат:мәгълүмат NLEX ; ! ""
муен:муен NLEX ; ! ""
кагыйдә:кагыйдә NLEX ; ! ""
фамилия:фамилия NLEX ; ! ""
роль:роль NLEX ; ! ""
команда:команда NLEX ; ! ""
яка:яка NLEX ; ! ""
ис:ис NLEX ; ! ""
яфрак:яфрак NLEX ; ! ""
тип:тип NLEX ; ! ""
хөррият:хөррият NLEX ; ! ""
чыгу:чыгу NLEX ; ! ""
маңгай:маңгай NLEX ; ! ""
мәйдан:мәйдан NLEX ; ! ""
елмаю:елмаю%{w%} NLEX ; ! "smile"
LEXICON Adjectives 
зур:зур ALEX ; ! ""
күп:күп ALEX ; ! ""
тиешле:тиешле ALEX ; ! ""
яңа:яңа ALEX ; ! ""
яхшы:яхшы ALEX ; ! ""
кирәкле:кирәкле ALEX ; ! ""
кирәк:кирәк ALEX ; ! ""
соңгы:соңгы ALEX ; ! ""
ахыргы:ахыргы ALEX ; ! ""
азаккы:азаккы ALEX ; ! ""
иске:иске ALEX ; ! ""
ак:ак ALEX ; ! ""
баш:баш ALEX ; ! ""
төп:төп ALEX ; ! ""
ерак:ерак ALEX ; ! ""
ерак:ерак ALEX ; ! ""
бәләкәй:бәләкәй ALEX ; ! ""
кече:кече ALEX ; ! ""
кечкенә:кечкенә ALEX ; ! ""
совет:совет ALEX ; ! ""
шурави:шурави ALEX ; ! ""
урыс:урыс ALEX ; ! ""
тулы:тулы ALEX ; ! ""
билгеле:билгеле ALEX ; ! ""
танылган:танылган ALEX ; ! ""
таныш:таныш ALEX ; ! ""
гомуми:гомуми ALEX ; ! ""
уртак:уртак ALEX ; ! ""
үткән:үткән ALEX ; ! ""
узган:узган ALEX ; ! ""
охшаш:охшаш ALEX ; ! ""
кызыл:кызыл ALEX ; ! ""
биек:биек ALEX ; ! ""
иртәнге:иртәнге ALEX ; ! ""
бөтен:бөтен ALEX ; ! ""
тулы:тулы ALEX ; ! ""
яшь:яшь ALEX ; ! ""
бик% зур:бик% зур ALEX ; ! ""
хәзерге:хәзерге ALEX ; ! ""
менә% дигән:менә% дигән ALEX ; ! ""
чын:чын ALEX ; ! ""
тере:тере ALEX ; ! ""
җанлы:җанлы ALEX ; ! ""
кара:кара ALEX ; ! ""
үз:үз ALEX ; ! ""
үзенеке:үзенеке ALEX ; ! ""
төрле:төрле ALEX ; ! ""
бөек:бөек ALEX ; ! ""
киләсе:киләсе ALEX ; ! ""
чираттагы:чираттагы ALEX ; ! ""
киләчәк:киләчәк ALEX ; ! ""
икенче:икенче ALEX ; ! ""
алдагы:алдагы ALEX ; ! ""
авыр:авыр ALEX ; ! ""
әзер:әзер ALEX ; ! ""
шәхси:шәхси ALEX ; ! ""
озын:озын ALEX ; ! ""
көчле:көчле ALEX ; ! ""
куәтле:куәтле ALEX ; ! ""
каты:каты ALEX ; ! ""
таныш:таныш ALEX ; ! ""
тиз:тиз ALEX ; ! ""
җитез:җитез ALEX ; ! ""
шәп:шәп ALEX ; ! ""
җәһәт:җәһәт ALEX ; ! ""
хәрби:хәрби ALEX ; ! ""
яшел:яшел ALEX ; ! ""
сәер:сәер ALEX ; ! ""
коточкыч:коточкыч ALEX ; ! ""
бердәнбер:бердәнбер ALEX ; ! ""
кыска:кыска ALEX ; ! ""
бу:бу ALEX ; ! ""
шәфкатьле:шәфкатьле ALEX ; ! ""
караңгы:караңгы ALEX ; ! ""
төп:төп ALEX ; ! ""
иң% мөһим:иң% мөһим ALEX ; ! ""
җиңел:җиңел ALEX ; ! ""
элекке:элекке ALEX ; ! ""
охшаш:охшаш ALEX ; ! ""
иңле:иңле ALEX ; ! ""
зур% түгел:зур% түгел ALEX ; ! ""
зур% булмаган:зур% булмаган ALEX ; ! ""
буш:буш ALEX ; ! ""
аерым:аерым ALEX ; ! ""
сылу:сылу ALEX ; ! ""
гүзәл:гүзәл ALEX ; ! ""
таза:таза ALEX ; ! ""
кеше:кеше ALEX ; ! ""
арык:арык ALEX ; ! ""
ят:ят ALEX ; ! ""
олы:олы ALEX ; ! ""
юан:юан ALEX ; ! ""
авыру:авыру ALEX ; ! ""
хаста:хаста ALEX ; ! ""
эш:эш ALEX ; ! ""
эре:эре ALEX ; ! ""
суык:суык ALEX ; ! ""
урындагы:урындагы ALEX ; ! ""
җирле:җирле ALEX ; ! ""
бертуган:бертуган ALEX ; ! ""
алтын:алтын ALEX ; ! ""
гадәти:гадәти ALEX ; ! ""
тимер:тимер ALEX ; ! ""
билгесез:билгесез ALEX ; ! ""
нәзек:нәзек ALEX ; ! ""
нечкә:нечкә ALEX ; ! ""
тогры:тогры ALEX ; ! ""
бик% яхшы:бик% яхшы ALEX ; ! ""
американ:американ ALEX ; ! ""
кемнең:кемнең ALEX ; ! ""
тиз:тиз ALEX ; ! ""
шат:шат ALEX ; ! ""
соң:соң ALEX ; ! ""
